Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, unless context otherwise requires:
(1) "Applicable criminal case" means a criminal case in which the judgment
requires the defendant to be confined in a secure correctional facility and the
record of the case indicates that the defendant is subject to an immigration
detainer or is otherwise subject to a transfer to federal custody;
(2) "Federal immigration agency" means the United States Department of Justice,
United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement, United States Customs and Border Protection, and any
other federal agency or successor agency charged with the enforcement of
immigration law;
(3) "Immigration detainer" means a facially sufficient written or electronic request
issued by a federal immigration agency using that agency’s official form to
request that another law enforcement agency detain a person because there is
probable cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable alien
under federal immigration law, including detainers issued pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
secs. 1226 and 1357 along with a warrant described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection. For purposes of this subsection, an immigration detainer is deemed
facially sufficient if:
(a) 1. The federal immigration agency’s official form is complete and
indicates on its face that the federal immigration official has probable
cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable alien
under federal immigration law; or
2. The federal immigration agency’s official form is incomplete and fails
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
to indicate on its face that the federal immigration official has
probable cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable
alien under federal immigration law, but is supported by an affidavit,
order, or other official documentation that indicates that the federal
immigration agency has probable cause to believe that the person to be
detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law; and
(b) The federal immigration agency supplies with its detention request a Form
I-200 Warrant for Arrest of Alien, a Form I-205 Warrant of
Removal/Deportation, or a successor warrant or other warrant authorized
by federal law;
(4) "Inmate" means a person in the custody of a law enforcement agency;
(5) "Law enforcement agency" means:
(a) Any public agency that employs a police officer as defined in KRS
15.420(2)(a) or a special law enforcement officer as defined in KRS
61.900(6)(a) to (e);
(b) Any public agency that is composed of or employs other public peace
officers;
(c) Jailers;
(d) Metropolitan correctional services departments operating under KRS
Chapter 67B;
(e) The Department of Corrections as organized under KRS Chapter 196 or any
of its subunits;
(f) A campus security authority as defined in KRS 164.948 of a public
institution operating under KRS Chapter 164; and
(g) Any other agency in this state charged with enforcement of state, county,
municipal, or federal laws or with managing custody of detained persons in
this state;
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
(6) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, or unified local
government;
(7) "Sanctuary policy" means a law, policy, practice, procedure, or custom adopted
or allowed by a state entity or local government which prohibits or impedes a law
enforcement agency from complying with 8 U.S.C. sec. 1373 or which prohibits
or impedes a law enforcement agency from communicating or cooperating with a
federal immigration agency that acts to limit or prohibit a law enforcement
agency from:
(a) Complying with an immigration detainer;
(b) Complying with a request from a federal immigration agency to notify the
agency before the release of an inmate or detained person in the custody of
the law enforcement agency;
(c) Providing a federal immigration agency access to an inmate for interview;
(d) Participating in any program or agreement authorized under 8 U.S.C. sec.
1357(g); or
(e) Providing a federal immigration agency with an inmate’s incarceration
status or release date; and
(8) "State entity" means the state or any office, board, bureau, commission,
department, branch, division, cabinet, or institution thereof, including public
institutions operating under KRS Chapter 164.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A state entity, law enforcement agency, or local government shall not adopt or have in
effect a sanctuary policy regarding aliens unlawfully present in the United States.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
(1) A law enforcement agency shall use all resources reasonably available to it to
support the enforcement of federal immigration law.
(2) Except as otherwise expressly prohibited by federal law, a state entity, law
enforcement agency, or local government, or an employee, agent, or
representative of a state entity, law enforcement agency, or local government
shall not prohibit or in any way restrict a law enforcement agency from taking
any of the following actions with respect to information regarding a person's
immigration status:
(a) Sending to or requesting, receiving, or reviewing information from a federal
immigration agency for the purposes set out in Sections 1 to 8 of this Act;
(b) Recording and maintaining information for the purposes set out in Sections
1 to 8 of this Act;
(c) Exchanging information with a federal immigration agency or another state
entity, law enforcement agency, or local government for the purposes set out
in Sections 1 to 8 this Act;
(d) Using information to comply with an immigration detainer; or
(e) Using information to confirm the identity of a person who is detained by a
law enforcement agency.
(3) This section shall apply to an official, representative, agent, or employee of a state
entity, law enforcement agency, or local government only when he or she is
acting within the scope of his or her official duties or employment.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In an applicable criminal case, when a judge sentences a defendant to
confinement at a secure correctional facility, the secure correctional facility shall
comply with federal requirements to effectuate the transfer of the inmate to
federal custody.
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
(2) When a secure correctional facility receives verification from a federal
immigration agency or otherwise verifies that an inmate sentenced as part of an
applicable criminal case is in the custody of the secure correctional facility and
the inmate was not convicted of an offense that would classify the inmate as a
violent offender under KRS 439.3401, the facility:
(a) 1. Shall notify a federal immigration agency of the anticipated date of
discharge of the inmate from confinement; and
2. If the detainee remains in the custody of the secure correctional
facility, shall notify a federal immigration agency of any change to the
anticipated date of discharge of the inmate;
(b) Shall cooperate in the transfer of the inmate to federal custody, and may
transfer an inmate to federal custody prior to the conclusion of the inmate's
sentence if a federal immigration agency so requests; and
(c) May securely transport the inmate to a federal facility in this state or to
another point of transfer to federal custody outside the jurisdiction of the
secure correctional facility. A secure correctional facility shall obtain
judicial authorization before securely transporting an inmate to a point of
transfer outside of this state.
(3) When a secure correctional facility receives verification from a federal
immigration agency or otherwise verifies that an inmate sentenced as part of an
applicable criminal case is in the custody of the secure correctional facility, and
the inmate was convicted of an offense that would classify the inmate as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401, the facility:
(a) 1. Shall notify a federal immigration agency of the anticipated date of
discharge of the inmate from confinement no later than thirty (30)
days prior to that date; and
2. Shall notify a federal immigration agency of any change to the
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
anticipated date of discharge of the inmate;
(b) Shall cooperate in the transfer of the inmate to federal custody upon
completion of the inmate's sentence, if a federal immigration agency so
requests; and
(c) May securely transport the inmate to a federal facility in this state or to
another point of transfer to federal custody outside the jurisdiction of the
secure correctional facility upon the completion of the inmate's sentence. A
secure correctional facility shall obtain judicial authorization before
securely transporting an inmate to a point of transfer outside of this state.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A law enforcement agency that has custody of a person subject to an immigration
detainer issued by a federal immigration agency shall:
(a) Provide notice to the judge authorized to grant or deny the person’s release
on bail that the person is subject to an immigration detainer; and
(b) Record in the person’s case file that the person is subject to an immigration
detainer and comply with the requests made in the immigration detainer.
(2) A law enforcement agency is not required to perform the duty set out in
subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person who is transferred to the
custody of the agency by another law enforcement agency if the transferring
agency performed that duty before the transfer.
(3) A judge who receives notice that a person is subject to an immigration detainer
shall cause the fact to be recorded in the court record, regardless of whether the
notice is received before or after a judgment in the case.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Each county shall endeavor to enter into an agreement or agreements with a federal
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
immigration agency for temporarily housing persons who are the subject of
immigration detainers and for the payment of the costs of housing and detaining those
persons in a county jail. A compliant agreement may include any contract between a
county and a federal immigration agency for housing or detaining persons subject to
immigration detainers, such as basic ordering agreements in effect on or after July 1,
2019, agreements authorized by 8 U.S.C. sec. 1357(g), or successor agreements and
other similar agreements authorized by federal law.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any state or local officer who
intentionally violates his or her duties under Sections 1 to 8 of this Act has
committed malfeasance and neglect of duty. Any state or local officer who
intentionally violates his or her duties under Sections 1 to 8 of this Act shall be
subject to impeachment.
(2) (a) If the Attorney General determines that a local government has violated any
provision of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, he or she shall issue a written
finding setting out the violation. The Attorney General shall then forward
the written finding to the local government that has committed the violation
along with a demand that it cease the violation.
(b) If, following receipt of the initial written finding of the Attorney General, a
local government fails to cease violation of any provision of Sections 1 to 8
of this Act, the Attorney General shall issue a written finding that the entity
has willfully violated Sections 1 to 8 of this Act. The Attorney General shall
then forward the finding to the state agency responsible for administering
road aid to the entity that is the subject of the written finding for suspension
under subsection (6) of Section 9 of this Act or subsection (9) of Section 10
of this Act.
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
(c) No later than six (6) months following a finding that a local government
has willfully violated any provision of Sections 1 to 8 of this Act, the
Attorney General shall conduct a review to determine if the entity subject to
the written finding has ceased violating Sections 1 to 8 this Act. If the
Attorney General determines that the entity is in compliance with Sections 1
to 8 of this Act, the Attorney General shall notify any state agency that he or
she forwarded written findings to pursuant to paragraph (b) of this
subsection, that the entity is in compliance with Sections 1 to 8 of this Act so
that municipal road aid money may be reinstated.
(3) (a) If a person subject to a United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement detainer is released from custody on or after the effective date
of this Act as a result of a sanctuary policy, and that person subsequently
commits an offense which would classify the person as a violent offender
under KRS 439.3401, the victim, or the victim's family if the victim of the
crime dies or sustains serious physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080 as
a result of the crime, may file a civil action against the local government or
local law enforcement agency in a court of competent jurisdiction for
compensatory damages, punitive damages, costs, and attorney's fees.
(b) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunities afforded to local
governments and local law enforcement agencies, including but not limited
to immunity under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States, are waived for purposes of this subsection.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Section 1 to 8 of this Act shall not:
(a) Require a state entity, law enforcement agency, or local government to
provide a federal immigration agency with information related to a victim of
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
or a witness to a criminal offense if the victim or witness timely and in good
faith responds to the entity or agency’s request for information and
cooperation in the investigation or prosecution of the offense; or
(b) Authorize a law enforcement agency to detain an alien unlawfully present
in the United States pursuant to an immigration detainer solely because the
alien witnessed or reported a crime, was a victim of a criminal offense, or
has been issued an order of protection by a family court or other court of
competent jurisdiction.
(2) A state entity, law enforcement agency, or local government that withholds
information regarding the immigration status of a victim of or witness to a
criminal offense pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall document the
victim or witness's cooperation in investigative records related to the offense and
shall retain the records for at least ten (10) years for the purpose of audit,
verification, or inspection by the Attorney General.
Section 9. KRS 177.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the Department of Rural and
Municipal Aid shall allocate the funds set apart under KRS 177.320(1) for
construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of state-maintained secondary and
rural highways as follows:
(a) One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned equally among the one hundred twenty
(120) counties;
(b) One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120)
counties on the basis of the ratio which the rural population of each county
bears to the total rural population of the state. "Rural population" as used here
means the population in a county outside cities, towns, and urban areas having
a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more as shown by the most
recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census, and county
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
population shall be determined by the most recent decennial census of the
United States Bureau of the Census;
(c) One-fifth (1/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120)
counties on the basis of the ratio that the public road mileage outside of cities,
towns, and urban areas having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or
more bears to the total mileage of such roads for the entire state; and
(d) Two-fifths (2/5) shall be apportioned among the one hundred twenty (120)
counties on the basis of the ratio which the square-mile rural area of the
county bears to the total square-mile rural area of the state. "Rural area" as
used here means that area of the county outside of cities, towns, and urban
areas having a population of twenty-five hundred (2,500) or more and shown
by the most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the
Census.
(2) A sum not exceeding six percent (6%) of the allocation provided by KRS
177.320(1) to each county shall be deducted at the beginning of each fiscal year and
adjusted quarterly to cover the maintenance, administrative, engineering, and other
costs of the program.
(3) Of the total amount apportioned by the provisions of this section, a sum not
exceeding six percent (6%) may be deducted and placed by the Department of
Rural and Municipal Aid in a special emergency account to be expended at the
direction of the commissioner to meet unforeseen emergencies on rural and
secondary roads and bridges.
(4) Apportionments as required by the provisions of this section shall be made on the
basis of revenue estimates supplied by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and
adjusted quarterly in accordance with the most recent revision of the estimates by
the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(5) Any county eligible to receive county road aid moneys in accordance with KRS
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
177.320 and this section shall be required to submit a uniform financial information
report to the Department for Local Government in accordance with KRS 65.905
before any payment of county road aid funds shall be made. The Department for
Local Government shall notify the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid no later
than March 1 annually of any county that has not submitted a uniform financial
information report. The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall, upon
notification by the Department for Local Government, immediately suspend all
county road aid moneys to the county until the county complies with the provisions
of KRS 65.900 to 65.925 and submits the uniform financial information report to
the Department for Local Government. The Department for Local Government
shall immediately notify the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid to reinstate
county road aid moneys to any county affected by this subsection as soon as the
county submits the uniform financial information report.
(6) The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid upon receiving a written finding as
set out in subsection (2)(b) of Section 7 of this Act shall immediately suspend all
county road aid moneys to the local government that is the subject of the finding.
The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall immediately reinstate
municipal road aid moneys to any local government upon receiving the
notification as set out in subsection (2)(c) of Section 7 of this Act.
(7) In distributing county road aid funds received by a consolidated local government
established under KRS Chapter 67C, a consolidated local government shall
establish procedures to identify project needs in unincorporated areas that prioritize
consideration of the following factors:
(a) Population growth;
(b) Population density; and
(c) Economic development potential.
Section 10. KRS 177.366 is amended to read as follows:
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
(1) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, on and after July 1, 1980, the
Finance and Administration Cabinet shall allocate to each incorporated city and
"unincorporated urban place" its pro rata share of the funds set apart for
construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of urban roads and streets on the
basis of the ratio which the population in the incorporated cities and in
"unincorporated urban places" bears to the total population in incorporated cities
and in "unincorporated urban places" of the state. "Unincorporated urban places" as
used here, means an area as defined in KRS 81.015, and any area outside of
incorporated cities, which area has a population of 2,500 or more as shown by the
most recent decennial census of the United States Bureau of the Census, and all
populations shall be determined by the most recent decennial census of the United
States.
(2) Any area which becomes incorporated after December 31, 1970, shall not be
eligible to participate in the Municipal Aid Program until the beginning of the
second fiscal year following its incorporation and population certification. It shall
be the responsibility of the newly incorporated area to provide the Finance and
Administration Cabinet with documentation from the United States Bureau of the
Census showing the population of the newly incorporated area as it existed at the
time of the last decennial census.
(3) In the event the newly incorporated area cannot obtain a population count from the
Bureau of the Census, it shall not be eligible to participate in the Municipal Aid
Program until the next decennial census.
(4) If an incorporated city, whose incorporation took place prior to December 31, 1970,
annexes additional area, the population of the annexed area will not be counted in
the allocation of municipal aid funds until the beginning of the second fiscal year
following annexation and population certification.
(5) It shall be the responsibility of the incorporated city to provide the Finance and
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
Administration Cabinet with documentation from the United States Bureau of the
Census showing the population for the annexed area as it existed at the time of the
last decennial census.
(6) If the incorporated area cannot obtain a population count from the Bureau of the
Census, the annexed area's population shall not be eligible to be counted in the
distribution of the municipal aid fund. However, the streets included in the annexed
areas shall be eligible to receive work through this program.
(7) Apportionments as required by the provisions of this section shall be made on the
basis of revenue estimates supplied by the Office of State Budget Director and shall
be adjusted quarterly in accordance with the most recent revision of the estimates
by the Office of State Budget Director.
(8) Any local government eligible to receive municipal road aid moneys pursuant to
KRS 177.365 to 177.369 shall be required to submit a uniform financial
information report to the Department for Local Government pursuant to KRS
65.905 before any payment of municipal road aid funds shall be made. The
Department for Local Government shall notify the Finance and Administration
Cabinet no later than March 1 annually of any local government that has not
submitted a uniform financial information report. The Finance and Administration
Cabinet shall, upon notification by the Department for Local Government,
immediately suspend all municipal road aid moneys to the local government until
the local government complies with the provisions of KRS 65.900 to 65.925 and
submits the uniform financial information report to the Department for Local
Government. The Department for Local Government shall immediately notify the
Finance and Administration Cabinet to reinstate municipal road aid moneys to any
local government affected by this subsection as soon as the local government
submits the uniform financial information report.
(9) The Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon receiving a written finding as set
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 875
out in subsection (2)(b) of Section 7 of this Act, shall immediately suspend all
municipal road aid moneys to the local government that is the subject of the
finding. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall immediately reinstate
municipal road aid moneys to any local government upon receiving the
notification as set out in subsection (2)(c) of Section 7 of this Act.
Section 11. This Act may be cited as the Lawful Immigration System Act of
2025.
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed